Louisiana, session 2026, HB1109.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:1199.22(B), 1199.23(2), 1199.24(A)(2) through (10), (B), (C),
(D)(1), and (E) through (G), 1199.25, and 1199.26(A)(2) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 15:1199.23(3) and (4), 1199.24(D)(6) and (H), 1199.26(A)(3), and 1199.27 are
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1199.22. Purpose; authorization of Post-Conviction Veterans Mentor Program
* * *
B. The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections is
authorized to establish a Post-Conviction Veterans Mentor Program for incarcerated
veterans, hereinafter referred to as "program". The department, with the assistance
of the Louisiana Department of Veterans Affairs, shall adopt regulations and
guidelines as it considers necessary for the administration and implementation of this
program. The provisions of this Part shall be implemented by the department only
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1368 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1109
to the extent consistent with that funds are available funding, whether internal or
external, and within the department for this purpose and to the extent that is
consistent with available resources.
§1199.23. Definitions
For the purposes of this Part:
* * *
(2)(a) "Veteran" means an honorably or generally a discharged member of
the United States Armed Forces or organized militia of the several states and
territories, including but not limited to a member of the Army, Navy, Air Force,
Space Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, National Guard, Air National Guard,
Reserves, State Guard, or a commissioned officer of the Public Health Service,
Environmental Science Services Administration, or National Oceanic and
Atmospheric Administration, or its predecessor, the United States Coast and
Geodetic Survey, whose discharged characterization identifies a release from service
under conditions other than dishonorable.
(b) A first responder who meets all of the following criteria:
(i) Is certified by P.O.S.T. and has at least two years of service.
(ii) Is identified as an emergency medical technician who is a prehospital
medical professional, holds a state license, and has maintained national registry
certification for at least two years.
(c) A state-certified or state-recognized first responder who has been
certified for at least two years, has proof of service, and has served at an assigned
duty station, including a fire station or other designated post, for at least two years.
(3) "Veterans Oversight Committee" means a committee established by the
secretaries of the Louisiana Department of Public Safety and Corrections and the
Louisiana Department of Veterans Affairs consisting of persons from both
departments and other veteran-associated advocates. The committee shall provide
guidance and supervision of the program and shall serve as the supervisory arm of
the department to ensure the success of the program.
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1368 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1109
(4) "Veterans transitional work facility" means a veteran-focused facility,
having identical classification as a work release program facility identified in R.S.
15:1111, and a rehabilitation facility described in R.S. 13:5366(B)(3)(b).
§1199.24. Post-Conviction Veterans Mentor Program for incarcerated veterans;
eligibility criteria
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an offender
who is incarcerated shall be eligible for consideration to participate in the
Post-Conviction Veterans Mentor Program if all of the following conditions are met:
* * *
(2) The offender has no convictions for an offense defined as a homicide in
R.S. 14:29 or as a sex offense in R.S. 15:541.
(3)(2) The offender is committed to the custody of the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections for a term or terms of imprisonment with or without benefit
of parole.
(4)(3) The offender has completed all programming deemed appropriate by
the Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
(5)(4) The offender has not committed any major disciplinary offenses in
thirty-six consecutive months prior to the transfer. A major disciplinary offense is
an offense identified as a Schedule B offense by the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections in the Disciplinary Rules and Procedures for Adult Offenders.
(6)(5) The offender has completed the mandatory minimum of one hundred
hours of prerelease programming in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 15:827.1
if such programming is available at the facility where the offender is incarcerated.
(7)(6) The offender has obtained a high school equivalent.
(8)(7) The offender, at the time of consideration for the program, has
obtained a "low risk" level designation determined by a validated risk assessment
instrument approved by the secretary of the department. Any other designation
requires a waiver with written reasons by the warden of the institution or his
designee.
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1368 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1109
(9) The offender is committed to the custody of the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections.
(10)(8) The offender has attained forty thirty years of age and has served at
least ten years of the term or terms of imprisonment.
(11)(9) The offender has completed a mentor training program as considered
appropriate by the Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
(12)(10) If the offender is serving a life sentence, The sentencing court and
the district attorney of the jurisdiction of the conviction shall consent.
B. Upon meeting the eligibility requirements set forth in Subsection A of this
Section, the offender shall then be subject to pre-screening prescreening and
assessments for suitability by the Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
office of adult services, for placement in a veterans transitional work release program
facility, in accordance with R.S. 15:1111 R.S. 15:1199.26.
C.(1) If the offender is approved to participate in the program by the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of adult services, they he shall
be transferred to an appropriate veterans transitional work program facility. After
three successful years in a veterans transitional work program facility, the offender
shall be granted a parole hearing by the committee on parole as provided in
Subsection G of this Section, if not otherwise eligible for a hearing prior to such
date, or by any other eligibility requirements stipulated by the board.
(2) If the offender is serving a life sentence, then after five successful years,
the offender shall be granted a pardon hearing by the committee on pardons. If the
offender's sentence is subsequently reduced to a fixed number of years, then the
offender shall be granted a parole hearing as provided in Subsection G of this
Section, if not otherwise eligible for a hearing prior to such date, or by any other
eligibility requirements stipulated by the board.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, any offender
who is granted parole pursuant to this Section, and whose parole is subsequently
revoked after participation in the program, shall not be eligible to participate in the
program a second time.
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1368 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1109
D. Additional requirements for participation in the program:
(1) Continue to participate in all programming considered appropriate by the
Veterans Oversight Committee, Department of Public Safety and Corrections, and
the Department of Veterans Affairs.
* * *
(6) Offenders may be required to submit to electronic monitoring.
E. Liability for all activity and possible illegal activity shall fall solely on the
offender participating in the program. The Department of Public Safety and
Corrections and its agents shall have indemnity for any and all actions taken by the
offender that may be illegal, that subjects the offender to parole revocation, or that
are deemed eligible to terminate the offender's participation in the Post-Conviction
Veterans Mentor Program, and for any advice, education, action, or information
relayed by the offender to any employee, mentee, or other participant in the program
that may or may not result in action that causes any outcome.
F. Any violation of the conditions of eligibility provided for in Subsection
D of this Section shall subject the offender to disciplinary sanctions up to and
including removal from the veterans transitional work release program facility. Any
offender removed from the program shall not be eligible for further consideration
pursuant to this Part.
G. After the successful completion of at least three years the requirements
of the program at the veterans transitional work release program facility, the offender
shall be granted a hearing before the committee on parole. If the offender is granted
parole by the committee on parole, then the offender shall be released on parole in
accordance with the provisions of R.S. 15:574.4.1 and 574.4.2. Any offender whose
parole is revoked after participation in the program shall not be eligible to participate
in the program a second time.
H. No offender is guaranteed acceptance into the program based solely upon
his veteran status or any other status. All offenders are duly screened, and the
department has the right to deny any offender, without reason, especially offenders
deemed a risk to public safety.
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1368 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1109
§1199.25. Mentor program for Veterans Court probation program; job assistance
While participating in the Post-Conviction Veterans Mentor Program, the
offender shall serve successfully complete the program and may participate in a
business industry vocational work program, upon written approval of the presiding
judge department, as a mentor in the Veterans Court probation program in the parish
of the transitional work release program in which the offender is housed.
§1199.26. Veterans Transitional transitional work facilities
A.
* * *
(2) Such facilities shall be operated and maintained for those offenders who
serve as mentors for the Veterans Court probation program and those veterans who
have strong rehabilitation potential. Existing transitional work release program
facilities, otherwise known as work release, may be used to provide services and
opportunities to the veterans participating in the program to benefit both the veterans
participating and the parish jails.
(3) Such facilities shall serve as treatment facilities as defined in R.S.
13:5366 of the Veterans Court program.
* * *
§1199.27. Purpose; pilot program; Post-Conviction Veterans Mentor Program;
efficacy; reporting
A.(1) The Legislature of Louisiana recognized the need to assist incarcerated
military veterans with veteran-focused rehabilitation programs to reduce the
incidence of recidivism. The Legislature of Louisiana also recognizes the need to
protect and maintain public safety. It is the intent of the Legislature of Louisiana to
create an opportunity to track the success of the implementation of the Post-
Conviction Veterans Mentor Program.
(2) Therefore, the secretaries of the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections and the Louisiana Department of Veterans Affairs may establish,
operate, contract, support, or partner to create a pilot program to study the
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1368 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1109
effectiveness of the Post-Conviction Veterans Mentor Program, with the goal of
assessing program implementation, to further the best interests of the state, their
departments, public safety, and the participating offenders.
B. The pilot program shall run no less than three years. The secretaries of the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections and the Louisiana Department of
Veterans Affairs shall generate a report semiannually and submit the report to the
House Special Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs by February fifteenth
and July fifteenth, respectively, of each year the pilot operates. The secretaries shall
include in the report, at a minimum, the number of veteran offenders participating
in the program, the number of disciplinary offenses initiated, and the corrective
measures used. Further, the secretaries shall include in the report the total amount
of class participation hours, participating jurisdictions of the Veterans Court
Probation program and Veterans Court Program, and any other information deemed
relevant upon request of the House Special Committee on Military and Veterans
Affairs.
C. Upon completion of the pilot program, the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections and the Louisiana Department of Veterans Affairs shall provide a
full synopsis of the program and its regulations and guidelines to the House Special
Committee on Military and Veterans Affairs to determine if any revisions of
legislation, regulations, guidelines, curriculum, or procedures are appropriate.